Utah statutes.
26-18-15.   Process to promote health insurance coverage for children.

(1)  The Department of Workforce Services, the State Board of Education, and the department shall:

(a)  collaborate with one another to develop a process to promote health insurance coverage for a child in school when:

(i)  the child applies for free or reduced price school lunch;

(ii)  a child enrolls in or registers in school; and

(iii)  other appropriate school related opportunities;

(b)  report to the Legislature on the development of the process under Subsection (1)(a) no later than November 19, 2008; and

(c)  implement the process developed under Subsection (1)(a) no later than the 2009-10 school year.

(2)  The Department of Workforce Services shall promote and facilitate the enrollment of children identified under Subsection (1)(a) without health insurance in the Utah Children's Health Insurance Program, the Medicaid program, or the Utah Premium Partnership for Health Insurance Program.



Enacted by Chapter 390, 2008 General Session

